West Virginia, session 2026, HB4627.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. WEST VIRGINIA PUBLIC EMPLOYEES INSURANCE ACT. §5-16-13a. Payment of costs by employer and employee for firefighters. (a) "Professional firefighter" means an individual employed as a firefighter by a state, county, or municipal entity during the time of the individual’s employment. (b) This section applies to: (1) Insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital, medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the state; and (2) Health maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or delivered in the state. (c) An entity subject to this section shall provide coverage to a professional firefighter for preventive cancer screenings in accordance with the latest screening guidelines issued by the international association of fire fighters. (d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, an entity subject to this section may not impose a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible requirement on coverage of preventive cancer screenings for professional firefighters as required under subsection (c) of this section.(2) If an insured or an enrollee is covered under a high–deductible health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C.§ 223, an entity subject to this section may subject preventive cancer screenings for professional firefighters to the deductible requirement of the high–deductible health plan.(e) This section may not be construed to prohibit an entity subject to this section from providing coverages that are greater than or more favorable to an insured or an enrollee than the coverage required under this section.